Alabama, session 2026rs, HB276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
20 Section 1. Sections 34-21-93.1 and 34-24-292 of the
21 Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
22 "§34-21-93.1
23 (a) When any law or rule requires a signature,
24 certification, stamp, verification, affidavit, or endorsement
25 by a physician, the document shall be deemed to authorize a
26 signature, certification, stamp, verification, affidavit, or
27 endorsement by a certified registered nurse practitioner or
28 certified nurse midwife for the items listed in this section.
Page 1

certified nurse midwife for the items listed in this section.
HB276 Engrossed
29 The authority in this section for a certified registered nurse
30 practitioner and a certified nurse midwife shall be subject to
31 an active collaboration agreement. This section applies to all
32 of the following:
33 (1) Certification of disability for patients to receive
34 special access parking or disability access parking tags or
35 placards.
36 (2) A signature required for any of the following:
37 a. The following documents that require a complete
38 history and physical examination consistent with the examining
39 provider's scope of practice and certification:
40 1. Physicals for bus drivers in this state using State
41 of Alabama forms.
42 2. Physicals to verify eligibility for students to
43 participate in the Special Olympics.
44 3. Employment and pre-employment physicals for
45 Transportation Security Agency (TSA) employees at an airport
46 or for governmental employees such as firefighters and law
47 enforcement officers.
48 4. Adoptive parent applications.
49 5. College or trade school physicals.
50 6. Boy Scout or Girl Scout physicals or physical
51 required by similar organizations.
52 7. Physicals to verify eligibility for students to
53 participate in K-12 school athletic activities including, but
54 not limited to, interscholastic athletic activities. The Board
55 of Nursing, on or before July 1, 2026, shall add these
56 physicals as an option to all certified registered nurse
Page 2

physicals as an option to all certified registered nurse
HB276 Engrossed
57 practitioner and certified nurse midwife model practice
58 protocols for the parties to a collaboration agreement to
59 select as an allowable standard skill.
60 b. Forms excusing a potential jury member due to an
61 illness.
62 c. Forms relating to absenteeism for employment or
63 school purposes, including, but not limited to, documents
64 associated with the federal Family and Medical Leave Act.
65 d. Authorizations for durable medical equipment.
66 e. Authorizations for diabetic testing supplies.
67 f. Authorization for diabetic shoes.
68 g. Home health recertification orders after initial
69 certification.
70 h. Within the state Medicaid system, any and all forms
71 for the ordering of medications, nutritional supplements, or
72 infant formulas, or referrals to providers of medical
73 specialties, home health services, and physical or occupation
74 therapy.
75 i. Death certificates.
76 j. Forms, including physical examination forms, needed
77 for certifications in residential or inpatient dwellings
78 within the Department of Mental Health.
79 k. Forms for ambulance transport.
80 l. Forms for donor breast milk.
81 m. Required documentation allowing a diabetic to renew
82 or obtain a driver's license.
83 (b) Additional forms may be approved by rule under the
84 Alabama Administrative Procedure Act by the State Board of
Page 3

Alabama Administrative Procedure Act by the State Board of
HB276 Engrossed
85 Medical Examiners, after consulting with the state
86 professional society of nurse practitioners, the state
87 professional society of nurse midwives, the state professional
88 society of physicians, or the Joint Committee of the State
89 Board of Medical Examiners and the Board of Nursing for
90 Advanced Practice Nurses as established by Section 34-21-81,
91 whichever is appropriate.
92 (c) This section shall not be construed to expand the
93 scope of practice for any certified registered nurse
94 practitioner or certified nurse midwife.
95 (d) This section does not expand the scope of a
96 collaborative physician's responsibility with regard to nurse
97 practitioners or nurse midwives under the laws of this state.
98 (e)(1) For purposes of this subsection, an athletic
99 association has the same meaning as provided in Section
100 16-1-52.1.
101 (2) An athletic association, club, or league shall not
102 refuse to accept physical examination forms to verify
103 eligibility for students to participate in K-12 school
104 athletic activities which are endorsed by a certified
105 registered nurse practitioner or certified nurse midwife in
106 compliance with this section."
107 "§34-24-292
108 (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
109 licensed assistant to a physician may perform medical services
110 when the services are rendered under the supervision of a
111 licensed physician or physicians approved by the board;
112 except, that no medical services may be performed under this
Page 4

except, that no medical services may be performed under this
HB276 Engrossed
113 article except under the supervision of an ophthalmologist in
114 the office in which the physician normally actually practices
115 his or her profession and nowhere else in any of the following
116 areas:
117 (1) The measurement of the powers or range of human
118 vision or the determination of the accommodation and
119 refractive state of the human eye or the scope of its
120 functions in general or the fitting or adaptation of lenses or
121 frames for the aid thereof.
122 (2) The prescribing or directing the use of or using
123 any optical device in connection with ocular exercises, visual
124 training, or orthoptics.
125 (3) The prescribing of contact lenses for or the
126 fitting or adaptation of contact lenses to the human eye.
127 Nothing in this section shall preclude the performance of
128 routine visual screening.
129 (b) In the performance of any medical service
130 contemplated by this article, an assistant to a physician
131 shall be conclusively presumed to be the agent, servant, or
132 employee solely of the licensed physician or physicians under
133 whose supervision he or she performs the service, and no other
134 person, firm, corporation, or other organization shall be held
135 liable or responsible for any act or omission of the assistant
136 arising out of the performance of the medical service.
137 (c) A licensed assistant to a physician registered to a
138 licensed physician practicing under a job description approved
139 in the manner prescribed by this article may prescribe legend
140 drugs to patients, subject to both of the following
Page 5

drugs to patients, subject to both of the following
HB276 Engrossed
141 conditions:
142 (1) The drug type, dosage, quantity prescribed, and
143 number of refills shall be authorized in an approved job
144 description signed by the physicians to whom the assistant is
145 registered.
146 (2) The drug shall be on the formulary approved under
147 the guidelines of the Board of Medical Examiners.
148 (d) Assistants to physicians may administer any legend
149 drug which they are authorized to prescribe under this
150 section. An assistant to a physician may not initiate a
151 call-in prescription in the name of his or her physician for
152 any drug, whether legend drug or controlled substance, which
153 the assistant is not authorized to prescribe under the job
154 description signed by his or her physician and approved under
155 this section, unless the drug is specifically ordered for the
156 patient by the physician either in writing or by a verbal
157 order which has been reduced to writing and which has been
158 signed by the physician within a time specified in the
159 guidelines of the Board of Medical Examiners.
160 (e)(1) An assistant to a physician who has successfully
161 completed the Physician Assistant National Certification
162 Examination and is registered to a physician practicing under
163 a job description approved in the manner prescribed by this
164 article may sign physicals to verify eligibility for students
165 to participate in K-12 school athletic activities including,
166 but not limited to, interscholastic athletic activities,
167 without requiring the additional signature of a physician. The
168 State Board of Medical Examiners, on or before July 1, 2026,
Page 6

State Board of Medical Examiners, on or before July 1, 2026,
HB276 Engrossed
169 shall update its forms to include these physicals as an option
170 for the supervising physician and eligible assistant to a
171 physician to select as an allowable standard skill.
172 (2)a. For purposes of this subdivision, an athletic
173 association has the same meaning as provided in Section
174 16-1-52.1.
175 b. An athletic association, club, or league shall not
176 refuse to accept physical examination forms to verify
177 eligibility for students to participate in K-12 school
178 athletic activities which are endorsed by an assistant to a
179 physician in compliance with this section."
180 Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
181 2026.
Page 7

2026.
HB276 Engrossed
182
183
184 House of Representatives
185 Read for the first time and referred ................15-Jan-26
186 to the House of Representatives
187 committee on Health
188
189 Read for the second time and placed ................05-Feb-26
190 on the calendar:
191 0 amendments
192
193 Read for the third time and passed ................10-Feb-26
194 as amended
195 Yeas 99
196 Nays 0
197 Abstains 6
198
199
200 John Treadwell
201 Clerk
202
Page 8